Vermont, session 2025-2026, H687.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. E.511.1 is amended to read:
Sec. E.511.1 MORATORIUM ON APPROVAL OF NEW APPROVED
INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Board
of Education shall be prohibited from approving an application for initial
approval of an approved independent school until further direction by the
General Assembly.
VT LEG #386181 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.687
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a change in either tax
status or conversion to a nonprofit organization by a therapeutic approved
independent school, absent any other changes, shall not affect the approval
status of the school.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the moratorium
on approval of new approved independent schools shall not apply to changes in
ownership of therapeutic approved independent schools as that term is defined
in 16 V.S.A. § 828(d). If submission of an application for initial approval of
an approved independent school is required as the result of a change in
ownership of a therapeutic approved independent school, that at the time of the
change in ownership is approved by the State Board of Education pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 166, the moratorium created pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall not apply and the Agency of Education and State Board of
Education shall process the application according to applicable State and
federal law.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386181 v.2